North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 21. Licenses and Permits Issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission.
§ 113-271.
Hook-and-line licenses in inland and joint fishing waters.

An inland hook-and-line fishing license issued under subdivisions (2), (3), (5), (6), (6a), (6b), and (6c) of subsection (d) of this section entitles the licensee to fish with hook and line in inland fishing waters, joint fishing waters, and public mountain trout waters. An inland hook-and-line fishing license issued under this section entitles the licensee to access and use Wildlife Resources Commission Property, but does not entitle the licensee to engage in fishing in coastal fishing waters.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 4.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

The hook-and-line fishing licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows:

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(g), effective September 1, 2019.

Resident State Inland Fishing License — $25.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State.

Lifetime Resident Comprehensive Inland Fishing License — $250.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State and is valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-283, s. 7, effective August 1, 2014.

Nonresident State Inland Fishing License — $45.00. This license shall be issued to an individual nonresident of the State.

Short-Term Inland Fishing Licenses. Short-term inland fishing licenses are valid only for the date or consecutive dates indicated on the licenses. Short-term inland fishing licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are:

Resident 10-day Inland Fishing License — $9.00. This license shall be issued only to a resident of the State.

Nonresident 10-day Inland Fishing License — $23.00. This license shall be issued only to a nonresident of the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.8, effective January 1, 2007.

(6a)

Age 70 Resident Lifetime Inland Fishing License — $15.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual resident of the State who is at least 70 years of age.

(6b)

Resident Disabled Veteran Lifetime Inland Fishing License — $10.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is a fifty percent (50%) or more disabled veteran as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or as established by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

(6c)

Resident Totally Disabled Lifetime Inland Fishing License — $10.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is totally and permanently disabled as determined by the Social Security Administration or as established by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

, (8) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.8, effective January 1, 2007.

(9)

Special Landholder and Guest Fishing License — $100.00. This license shall be issued only to the landholder of private property bordering inland or joint fishing waters. This license shall entitle the landholder and guests of the landholder to fish from the shore or any pier or dock originating from the property without any additional fishing license. This license is applicable only to private property and private docks and piers and is not valid for any public property, pier, or dock nor for any private property, pier, or dock operated for any commercial purpose whatsoever. This license shall not be in force unless displayed on the premises of the property and only entitles fishing without additional license to persons fishing from the licensed property and then only when fishing within the private property lines. This license is not transferable as to person or location. For purposes of this subdivision, a guest is any individual invited by the landholder to fish from the property at no charge. A charge includes any fee, assessment, dues, rent, or other consideration which must be paid, whether directly or indirectly, in order to be allowed to fish from the property, regardless of the stated reason for such charge.

(10)

Mountain Heritage Trout Waters Three-Day Fishing License — $8.00. This license shall be issued to an individual resident or nonresident of the State and shall entitle the holder to fish in waters designated by the Wildlife Resources Commission as mountain heritage trout waters for the three consecutive days indicated on the license. An individual who holds a mountain heritage trout waters three-day fishing license does not need to hold any other hook-and-line fishing license issued pursuant to this subsection in order to fish in mountain heritage trout waters.

History.

1929, c. 335, ss. 1-4; 1931, c. 351; 1933, c. 236; 1935, c. 478; 1945, c. 529, ss. 1, 2; c. 567, ss. 1-4; 1949, c. 1203, s. 2; 1953, c. 1147; 1955, c. 198, s. 1; 1957, c. 849, s. 2; 1959, c. 164; 1961, c. 312; c. 834, ss. 3-6; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1969, c. 761; c. 1042, s. 9; 1973, c. 476, s. 143; c. 504; 1975, c. 197, s. 15; 1979, c. 737, ss. 1, 2; c. 748, s. 6; c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1178, ss. 3, 5; 1981, c. 482, s. 5; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 5; 1983, c. 140, s. 6; 1987, c. 156, ss. 8, 9; c. 827, s. 98; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 909, s. 2; c. 926; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 4; 1995, c. 535, s. 6.1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1999-456, s. 28; 2005-455, s. 1.8; 2006-255, s. 8; 2013-283, s. 7; 2019-204, s. 6(g).

Local Modification.

Transylvania: 1995, c. 314, s. 1; city of Mebane: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 843.

Cross References.

As to the Wildlife Endowment Fund, see

G.S. 143-250.1

.

§ 113-272.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(h), effective September 1, 2019.

History.

1953, cc. 432, 828; 1955, c. 198, s. 2; 1961, c. 834, s. 2; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1969, c. 1042, s. 10; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1975, c. 197, s. 16; 1979, c. 748, s. 7; c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1178, ss. 4, 5; 1981, c. 482, s. 6; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 6; 1983, c. 140, s. 7; 1987, c. 156, s. 10; c. 827, s. 98; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 5; 2001-91, s. 6; 2007-408, ss. 1, 2; 2013-283, s. 8; repealed by 2019-204, s. 6(h), effective September 1, 2019.

Cross References.

As to current provisions as to Mountain Heritage Trout Waters Three-Day Fishing License, see now G.S. 113-271(d)(10).

§ 113-272.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

§ 113-272.2.
Special device licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, no one may fish in inland fishing waters with any special device without having first procured a current and valid special device license. Special devices are all devices used in fishing other than hook and line.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-91, s. 7, effective July 1, 2001.

The special device licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows:

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-283, s. 9, effective August 1, 2014.

(1a)

Resident Special Device License — $75.00. Except as rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission provide for use of equipment by more than one person, this license is valid only for use by an individual resident of the State. It authorizes the taking of nongame fish from inland fishing waters with special devices authorized by the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission for use in specified waters. The Wildlife Resources Commission may restrict the user of the license to specified registered equipment, require tagging of items of equipment, charge up to one dollar ($1.00) per tag issued, and require periodic catch data reports. Nongame fish lawfully taken under this license may be sold.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-283, s. 9, effective August 1, 2014.

(2a)

Nonresident Special Device License — $500.00. Except as rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission provide for use of equipment by more than one person, this license is valid only for use by an individual within the State. It is otherwise subject to the terms and conditions set out in subdivision (1a) of this subsection.

, (4) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 156, s. 11.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 36, s. 2.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981, c. 620, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1201, s. 7; 1983, c. 140, s. 8; 1987, c. 156, ss. 11, 12; c. 827, s. 98; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 778, s. 1; 1995, c. 36, s. 2; 2001-91, s. 7; 2013-283, s. 9.

Local Modification.

Columbus: 2003-21, s. 1 (as to portions of Waccamaw and Lumber Rivers).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-283, s. 9, effective August 1, 2014, deleted subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(2); deleted “Commercial” preceding “Special Device” in the subdivision headings of subdivisions (c)(1a) and (c)(2a); in subdivision (c)(1a), deleted “four or more” preceding “special devices” in the second sentence, and substituted “75.00” for “$100.00”; and substituted “$500.00” for “$200.00” in subdivision (c)(2a).

§ 113-272.3.
Special provisions respecting fishing licenses; grabbling; taking bait fish; use of landing nets; lifetime licenses issued from Wildlife Resources Commission headquarters; personalized lifetime sportsman combination licenses.

The Wildlife Resources Commission by rule may define the meaning of “hook and line” and “special device” as applied to fishing techniques. Any technique of fishing that may be lawfully authorized which employs neither the use of any special device nor hook and line must be pursued under the appropriate hook-and-line fishing license.

In accordance with established fishing customs and the orderly conservation of wildlife resources, the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule provide for use of nets or other special devices which it may authorize as an incident to hook-and-line fishing or for procuring bait fish without requiring a special device license. In this instance, however, the individual fishing must meet applicable hook-and-line license requirements.

Lifetime licenses are issued from the Wildlife Resources Commission headquarters to facilitate compliance with 50 C.F.R. § 80.31. Each application for any Infant Lifetime Sportsman, Youth Lifetime Sportsman, or Age 70 Resident Lifetime License must be accompanied by a copy of the birth certificate, adoption order containing the date of birth, or other proof of age satisfactory to the Commission, of the individual to be named as the licensee. Each application for a Fallen Wildlife Officers Memorial Lifetime Sportsman License shall be accompanied by proof of relationship to the fallen wildlife officer, satisfactory to the Wildlife Resources Commission, of the individual to be named as the licensee.

In issuing lifetime licenses, the Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to adopt rules to establish a personalized series for certain license types and to charge a five dollar ($5.00) administrative fee, to be deposited in the Wildlife Fund, to defray the cost of issuance of the personalized license. The fee shall not be assessed for a personalized Fallen Wildlife Officers Memorial Lifetime Sportsman License as enacted under

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b)(9).

Mountain Heritage Trout Waters Program. — The Wildlife Resources Commission shall establish and implement a Mountain Heritage Trout Waters Program to promote trout fishing as a heritage tourism activity. The Commission shall develop criteria for participation in the Program by cities and prepare a management plan for mountain heritage trout waters. A city that meets the criteria for participation in the Program shall be designated by the Commission as a Mountain Heritage Trout City.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981, c. 482, s. 8; c. 620, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 6.1; 2005-455, s. 1.9; 2006-255, s. 9; 2018-82, s. 3; 2019-204, s. 6(i).

Cross References.

As to adoption of rules establishing fees for hunting, fishing, trapping and activity licenses issued and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission, see

G.S. 113-270.1

B(e).

§ 113-272.4.
Collection licenses.

In the interest of the orderly and efficient conservation of wildlife resources, the Wildlife Resources Commission may provide for the licensing of individuals to take any of the wildlife resources of the State under a collection license that may serve in lieu of any other license required in this Article. This license authorizes incidental transportation and possession of the wildlife resources necessary to implement the authorized purposes of the taking, but the Wildlife Resources Commission in its discretion may additionally impose permit requirements under subsection (d) below and

G.S. 113-274

.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may delegate to the Executive Director the authority to impose time limits during which the license is valid and restrictions as to what may be taken and method of taking and possession, in the interests of conservation objectives. Methods of taking under a collection license need not be restricted to those applicable to ordinary hunting, trapping, or fishing, but the licensee shall observe the restrictions as to taking, transportation, and possession imposed by the Executive Director upon the granting of the license.

When a more limited duration period is not set by the Executive Director, collection licenses are valid from January 1 through December 31 in any year. This license is issued upon payment of ten dollars ($10.00). The Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules to utilize replacement costs of wildlife resources to offset the impact of collection or possession activities.

As necessary, the Executive Director may administratively impose on licensees under this section restrictions upon individuals taking, transporting, or possessing under the license which will permit ready identification and control of those involved in the interest of efficient administration of laws pertaining to wildlife resources. Restrictions may include requirements as to record keeping, tagging, marking packages, cages, or containers and exhibition of additional limited-purpose and limited-time permits that may be issued without charge to cover particular activities and other actions that may be administratively required in the reasonable implementation of the objectives of this Subchapter.

If the Executive Director deems it administratively appropriate and convenient to do so, in the interests of simplifying the administration of licensing requirements, the Executive Director may grant particular licensees under this section the privilege of utilizing assistants in taking, transporting, or possessing wildlife resources who themselves are not licensed. Any assistants so taking, transporting, or possessing wildlife resources shall have readily available for inspection a written authorization from the licensee to engage in the activity in question. The written authorization shall contain information administratively required by the Executive Director, and a copy of the authorization must be submitted to the Wildlife Resources Commission before any assistant acts under the authorization. The Executive Director may refuse to issue, refuse to renew, or revoke the privilege conferred in this subsection. If this is done, each individual engaged in taking, transporting, or possessing wildlife resources under this section shall meet all applicable licensing and permit requirements.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 2019-204, s. 6(j).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(j), effective September 1, 2019, rewrote this section.

§ 113-272.5.
Captivity license.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may license individuals to hold at a specified location wild animals and wild birds that are lawfully taken, crippled, tame, or unfit for immediate release into their natural habitat, or one or more of any particular species of wild animal or wild bird alive in captivity for scientific, educational, exhibition, or other purposes. Before issuing this license, the Executive Director must determine that issuance of the license is appropriate under the objectives of this Subchapter, and that the wild animal or wild bird was not acquired unlawfully or merely as a pet. Upon refusing to issue the captivity license, the Executive Director may either take possession of the wild animal or wild bird for appropriate disposition or issue a captivity permit under G.S. 113-274(c)(1b) for a limited period until the holder makes proper disposition of the wild animal or wild bird.

Unless a shorter time is set for a license upon its issuance under the provisions of subsection (c), captivity licenses are annual licenses issued beginning January 1 each year and running until the following December 31. The captivity license for holding shall be issued upon payment of fifty dollars ($50.00) and the captivity license for rehabilitation shall be issued upon payment of ten dollars ($10.00) to the Wildlife Resources Commission.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may require standards of caging and care and reports to and supervision by employees of the Wildlife Resources Commission in furtherance of the objectives of this Subchapter. The Executive Director in implementing the provisions of this section may administratively impose restrictions upon the mode of captivity deemed necessary, including prescribing methods of treatment and handling. To this end, the Executive Director may issue the captivity license with an expiration date earlier than December 31 and may also act to terminate any captivity license earlier than the expiration date for good cause.

Any substantial deviation from reasonable requirements imposed by rule or administratively under the authority of this section renders possession of the wild animal or wild bird unlawful.

No captivity license may be issued for any cougar (Felis concolor), except to:

A bona fide publicly supported zoo.

An educational or scientific research institution.

An individual who lawfully possessed the cougar on June 29, 1977. The license may not be granted, however, for possession of a cougar within a municipality which prohibits such possession by ordinance.

An individual who holds a cougar without caging under conditions simulating a natural habitat, the development of which is in accord with plans and specifications developed by the holder and approved by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

The licensing provisions of this section apply to black bears held in captivity, but, to the extent that it differs from this section, Article 2 of Chapter 19A of the General Statutes governs the keeping of black bears in captivity.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1285, s. 3; 1981, c. 575, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 2013-3, s. 1; 2019-204, s. 6(k).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-3, s. 1, effective March 6, 2013, in the first sentence of subsection (a), added “lawfully taken,” deleted “otherwise” preceding “unfit for immediate release,” and at the end of the first sentence, added “for scientific, educational, exhibition, or other purposes.”

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(k), effective September 1, 2019, rewrote subsections (a) and (c); and substituted “The captivity license for holding shall be issued upon payment of fifty dollars ($50.00) and the captivity license for rehabilitation shall be issued upon payment of ten dollars ($10.00)” for “This license is issued upon payment of five dollars ($5.00)” at the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (b).

§ 113-272.6.
Possession, Transportation, Importation, and Exportation of non-farmed cervids.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall regulate the possession and transportation, including importation and exportation, of non-farmed cervids, including game carcasses and parts of game carcasses extracted by hunters and carcasses and parts of carcasses imported from hunt facilities as defined by USDA Standards. For purposes of this section, the term “non-farmed cervid” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 106-549.97

. The Commission shall follow the USDA Standards as defined in

G.S. 106-549.97

and the provisions set forth in 9 C.F.R. Part 55 and 9 C.F.R. Part 81 in the implementation of this section and shall not adopt any rule or standard that is in conflict with, in lieu of, or more restrictive than the USDA Standards. The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section, including requirements for transportation, importation, and exportation permits. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Commission may charge a fee of up to fifty dollars ($50.00) for the processing of applications for transportation, importation, and exportation permits, and the renewal or modification of those permits. The fees collected shall be applied to the costs of administering this section.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall notify every applicant for a permit that any permit issued is subject to the applicant’s compliance with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services’ requirements for transportation pursuant to Article 34 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall regulate the production, sale, and transportation, including importation and exportation, of farmed cervids for commercial purposes and the licensing of farmed cervid facilities pursuant to

G.S. 106-549.97

. No action taken by the Wildlife Resources Commission shall in any way limit the authority of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to regulate farmed cervids.

, (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-263, s. 14(b), effective September 30, 2015.

History.

2003-344, s. 5; 2014-100, s. 14.26(e); 2015-263, s. 14(b).

§ 113-273.
Other licenses.

Except when otherwise indicated, licenses in this section are annual licenses issued beginning January 1 each year running until the following December 31.

Except as otherwise provided, no person may engage in any activity for which a license is provided under this section without first having procured a current and valid license for that activity. In implementing the provisions of this section, the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule govern every aspect of the licensee’s dealings in wildlife resources. Specifically, these rules may require licensees to:

Implement a system of tagging or otherwise identifying and controlling species regulated under the license and pay a reasonable fee, for each tag furnished by the Wildlife Resources Commission to defray costs;

Keep records and statistics in record books furnished by the Wildlife Resources Commission, and pay a reasonable charge to defray the cost of furnishing the books;

Be subject to inspection at reasonable hours and audit of wildlife resources and pertinent records and equipment;

Make periodic reports;

Post performance bonds payable to the Wildlife Resources Commission conditioned upon faithful compliance with provisions of law; and

Otherwise comply with reasonable rules and administrative requirements that may be imposed under the authority of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 18, s. 3.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 18, s. 3.

Fur-Dealer License. — Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any individual in this State who deals in furs must obtain an appropriate fur-dealer license. For the purposes of this subsection, “dealing in furs” is engaging in the business of buying or selling fur-bearing animals or other wild animals that may lawfully be sold, the raw furs, pelts, or skins of those animals, or the furs, pelts, or skins of wild animals which may not themselves be sold but whose fur, pelt, or skin may lawfully be sold. A hunter or trapper who has lawfully taken wild animals whose fur, pelt, or skin is permitted to be sold under this subsection is not considered a fur dealer if he exclusively sells the animals or the furs, pelts, and skins, as appropriate, to licensed fur dealers. All fur-dealer licenses are annual licenses issued beginning July 1 each year running until the following June 30. Fur-dealer licenses issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission are as follows:

Resident fur-dealer license, sixty dollars ($60.00). Authorizes an individual resident of the State to deal in furs in accordance with the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Nonresident fur-dealer license, three hundred dollars ($300.00). Authorizes an individual within the State to deal in furs in accordance with the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Fur-dealer station license, one hundred twenty dollars ($120.00). Authorizes a person or individual to deal in furs at an established location where fur dealings occur under the supervision of a responsible individual manager named in the license. Individual employees of the business dealing in furs solely at the established location under the supervision of the manager need not acquire an individual license. Any employee who also deals in furs outside the established location shall obtain the appropriate individual license. Individuals dealing in furs at an established location may elect to do so under their individual licenses.The Executive Director may administratively provide for reissuance of a station license without charge for the remainder of the year when either a business continues at an established location under a new supervising manager or the business changes to a new location. Before reissuing the license, however, the Executive Director shall determine that there is a continuation of essentially the same business previously licensed and that any new supervising manager meets the qualifications imposed by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. The supervising manager shall file the names of all employees of the business covered by a fur-dealer station license, whether temporary or permanent, including employees who process or skin the animals.

The Executive Director shall furnish supervising managers and individual licensees with forms or record books for recording required information as to purchase, sale, importation, exportation, and other dealings, and make a reasonable charge to cover the costs of any record books furnished. It is unlawful for anyone dealing in furs to fail to submit reports required by rules or reasonable administrative directives.

Controlled Hunting Preserve Operator License. — The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized by rule to set standards for and to license the operation of controlled hunting preserves operated by private persons. Controlled hunting preserves are of three types: one is an area marked with appropriate signs along the outside boundaries on which only domestically raised chukars, Hungarian partridges, and game birds other than wild turkeys are taken; one is an area enclosed with a dog-proof fence on which rabbits may be hunted with dogs only; and one is an area enclosed with a dog-proof fence on which foxes and coyotes may be hunted with dogs only. A controlled fox and coyote hunting preserve operated for private use may be of any size; a controlled hunting preserve operated for commercial purposes shall be an area of not less than 500 acres or of such size as set by regulation of the Wildlife Resources Commission, which shall take into account differences in terrain and topography, as well as the welfare of the wildlife.Operators of controlled fox hunting preserves may purchase live foxes and coyotes from licensed trappers who live-trap foxes and coyotes during any open season for trapping them and may, at any time, take live foxes from their preserves for sale to other licensed operators. The controlled hunting preserve operator license for domestically raised birds, foxes, and coyotes may be purchased for a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00). The controlled hunting preserve operator license for rabbits may be purchased for a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The controlled hunting preserve operator license is an annual license issued beginning 1 July each year running until the following 30 June.

Game Bird Propagation License. — No person may propagate game birds in captivity or possess game birds for propagation without first procuring a license under this subsection. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule prescribe the activities to be covered by the propagation license, which species of game birds may be propagated, and the manner of keeping and raising the birds, in accordance with the overall objectives of conservation of wildlife resources. Except as limited by this subsection, propagated game birds may be raised and sold for purposes of propagation, stocking, food, or taking in connection with dog training as authorized in G.S. 113-291.1(d). Migratory game bird operations authorized under this subsection must also comply with any applicable provisions of federal law and rules. The Wildlife Resources Commission may impose requirements as to shipping, marking packages, banding, tagging, or wrapping the propagated birds and other restrictions designed to reduce the change of illicit game birds being disposed of under the cover of licensed operations. The Wildlife Resources Commission may make a reasonable charge for any bands, tags, or wrappers furnished propagators. The game bird propagation license is issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission upon payment of a fee of ten dollars ($10.00). It authorizes a person or individual to propagate and sell game birds designated in the license, in accordance with the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission, except:

Wild turkey and ruffed grouse may not be sold for food.

Production and sale of pen-raised quail for food purposes is under the exclusive control of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Wildlife Resources Commission, however, may regulate the possession, propagation, and transportation of live pen-raised quail.

Wild turkey acquired or raised under a game bird propagation license shall be confined in a cage or pen approved by the Wildlife Resources Commission and no such wild turkey shall be released for any purpose or allowed to range free. It is a Class 3 misdemeanor to sell wild turkey or ruffed grouse for food purposes, to sell quail other than lawfully acquired pen-raised quail for food purposes, or to release or allow wild turkey to range free.

Furbearer Propagation License. — No person may engage in propagation in captivity or possess any species of furbearers for propagation for the purpose of selling the animals or their pelts for use as fur without first procuring a license under this subsection. The furbearer propagation license is issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). It authorizes the propagation or sale of the pelts or carcasses of the species of furbearing animals named therein, including bobcats, opossums and raccoons, or red and silver foxes (Vulpes vulpes), for use as fur. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule prescribe the activities covered by the license, the manner of keeping and raising the animals and the manner of killing them prior to sale, in accordance with overall objectives of conservation of wildlife resources and humane treatment of wild animals raised in captivity. The Wildlife Resources Commission may require tagging of the pelts or carcasses of the animals prior to sale in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 113-276.1(5) and G.S. 113-291.4(g). It is unlawful for any person licensed under this subsection to sell any pelt or carcass of any furbearing animal or fox to any other person who is not lawfully authorized to buy and possess the same, or to sell or deliver a live specimen of any such animal to any person who is not authorized to buy or receive and to hold the animal in captivity.

[Reserved.]

Taxidermy License. — Any individual who engages in taxidermy, including the tanning of hides, involving wildlife for any compensation, including reimbursement for the cost of materials, must first procure a taxidermy license. This license is an annual license issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for fifty dollars ($50.00). In addition to a taxidermy license, license holders engaging in taxidermy of any species of the family Cervidae must also obtain a taxidermy cervid certification issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for five dollars ($5.00), the proceeds of which shall be used to fund the Cervid Health Cooperator Program and for other chronic wasting disease surveillance. The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized by rule to set standards and reporting requirements for taxidermy licenses and certifications. No taxidermist subject to license requirements may sell any game or game fish in which he deals except that a taxidermist may acquire a valid possessory lien upon game or game fish under the terms of Chapter 44A of the General Statutes and, with a trophy sale permit from the Wildlife Resources Commission, may sell the game or game fish under the procedure authorized in Chapter 44A. Wildlife acquired by a taxidermist is deemed “personal property” for the purposes of Chapter 44A.

Wildlife Control Agent License. — An individual who engages in wildlife damage control or wildlife removal activities, including bat eviction, for compensation, including reimbursement for the cost of materials, shall first procure a wildlife control agent license. This is an annual license issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for fifty dollars ($50.00). This license shall not be required for licensed trappers taking wild animals during the established trapping season for that species. The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized by rule to set standards for and to license wildlife control agents.

(
l
1)

Wildlife Control Technician Certification. —

An individual who is under the direct supervision of a licensed wildlife control agent and who engages in wildlife damage control or wildlife removal activities for compensation under the direct supervision of a licensed wildlife control agent shall first procure a wildlife control technician certification. This is an annual certification issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for twenty-five dollars ($25.00). This certification shall not authorize the individual to issue depredation permits. This certification shall not be required for licensed trappers taking wild animals during the established trapping season for that species. For purposes of this subsection, the term “wildlife damage control or wildlife removal activities” shall include bat eviction and alligator damage control or removal activities, and the term “for compensation” shall include reimbursement for the cost of materials. The Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules to certify and set standards for wildlife control technicians.

Alligator Control Agent Certification. — An individual who engages in alligator damage control or removal activities for compensation, including reimbursement for the cost of materials, shall first procure an alligator control agent certification, as well as a wildlife control agent license under subsection (l) of this section. This is an annual certification issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission for twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized by rule to set standards for and to certify alligator control agents. This certification does not include privileges conveyed with an endangered species permit. The endangered species permit shall be obtained prior to conducting activities under the authorization of this certification.

History.

1929, c. 333, ss. 1-7; c. 198, ss. 1, 2, 4; 1933, c. 337, ss. 1-4; c. 430, s. 1; 1935, c. 471, ss. 1-3; c. 486, ss. 4, 12, 21; 1937, c. 45, s. 1; 1945, c. 617; 1949, c. 1203, s. 1; 1957, cc. 386, 841; c. 849, s. 1; 1959, c. 304; 1961, c. 311; c. 834, s. 1; c. 1056; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1967, c. 790; 1969, c. 1030; c. 1042, ss. 1-5; 1971, c. 242; c. 282, s. 1; c. 515, s. 5; c. 705, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 1098; c. 1262, ss. 18, 86; 1975, c. 197, ss. 1-4, 13, 14; 1977, c. 658; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981, c. 620, ss. 4-6; 1983, c. 140, s. 9; 1985, c. 476, s. 1; 1987, c. 133; c. 827, s. 98; 1989, c. 616, s. 3; 1993, c. 18, s. 3; c. 539, s. 854; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-261, s. 81; 2003-96, s. 1; 2019-204, s. 6(l); 2021-160, ss. 4(a), 9.

Cross References.

As to regulation of pen-raised quail by Department of Agriculture and Wildlife Resources Commission, see

G.S. 106-549.94

.